Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.1132

Firearm sales and transfers—Firearms safety training program—Exceptions.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1163-S2.SL) ***

(1) A person applying for the purchase or transfer of a firearm must provide proof of completion of a recognized firearms safety training program within the last five years that, at a minimum, includes instruction on:

(a) Basic firearms safety rules;

(b) Firearms and children, including secure gun storage and talking to children about gun safety;

(c) Firearms and suicide prevention;

(d) Secure gun storage to prevent unauthorized access and use;

(e) Safe handling of firearms;

(f) State and federal firearms laws, including prohibited firearms transfers and locations where firearms are prohibited;

(g) State laws pertaining to the use of deadly force for self-defense; and

(h) Techniques for avoiding a criminal attack and how to manage a violent confrontation, including conflict resolution.

(2) The training must be sponsored by a federal, state, county, or municipal law enforcement agency, a college or university, a nationally recognized organization that customarily offers firearms training, or a firearms training school with instructors certified by a nationally recognized organization that customarily offers firearms training. The proof of training shall be in the form of a certification that states under the penalty of perjury that the training included the minimum requirements.

(3) The training may include stories provided by individuals with lived experience in the topics listed in subsection (1)(a) through (g) of this section or an understanding of the legal and social impacts of discharging a firearm.

(4) The firearms safety training requirement of this section does not apply to:

(a) A person who is a:

(i) General authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020;

(ii) Limited authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020 who as a normal part of their duties has arrest powers and carries a firearm;

(iii) Specially commissioned Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020 who as a normal part of their duties has arrest powers and carries a firearm; or

(iv) Federal peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020 who as a normal part of their duties has arrest powers and carries a firearm; or

(b) A person who is an active duty member of the armed forces of the United States, an active member of the national guard, or an active member of the armed forces reserves who, as part of the applicant's service, has completed, within the last five years, a course of training in firearms proficiency or familiarization that included training on the safe handling and shooting proficiency with firearms.

[ 2023 c 161 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 161: See note following RCW 9.41.090.